Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3008
Department of Economic Development; audit employer.

The Department of Economic Development shall, prior to making the job training reimbursement, audit the employer for compliance with the Teleworker Job Creation Act. The department may utilize the Administrative Cash Fund to support the costs of audits and administration of the Teleworker Job Creation Act.

Laws 2010, LB1081, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 144.
December 31, 2026